Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4110
Commission; administrative office.

The commission may establish an administrative office in the State of Nebraska at such place as may be suitable for the furtherance of the Dry Pea and Lentil Resources Act. The commission shall not purchase, construct, or otherwise obtain title to its own administrative office, but shall be limited to leasing state or commercial office space.

Laws 2020, LB803, § 10.